Florida, session 2026, SB818.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 70 71 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (e) and (f) of subsection (4) 72 of section 944.275, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 73 paragraphs (h) and (i), respectively, and amended, and new 74 paragraphs (e) and (f) and paragraph (g) are added to that 75 subsection, to read: 76 944.275âGain-time.â 77 (4) 78 (e)âNotwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of incentive 79 gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the department 80 may grant awards of 60 to 180 additional days of vocational or 81 workforce preparedness incentive gain-time to an inmate who is 82 otherwise eligible and who successfully completes requirements 83 for, and is or has been during the current commitment awarded, a 84 vocational certificate not resulting in credit under paragraph 85 (d), or who completes any other career, workforce preparedness, 86 or technical education program, including the prison 87 entrepreneurship program. The department may also grant awards 88 of 30-90 days to an inmate who completes an educational or 89 rehabilitation program not resulting in credit under paragraph 90 (d) or this paragraph, including, but not limited to, drug, 91 behavioral health, or mental health treatment programs, life 92 skills, reentry programs, or character-based programs. 93 (f)âNotwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of incentive 94 gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the department 95 may grant up to 5 days per month of workforce preparedness 96 incentive gain-time for each month in which an inmate 97 participates in a vocational or workforce preparedness program 98 as designated by the department. Under no circumstances may an 99 inmate receive workforce preparedness incentive gain-time awards 100 in excess of 15 percent of the sentence imposed for that inmate. 101 (g)âNotwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of incentive 102 gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the department 103 may grant up to three additional incentive gain-time awards of 104 up to 60 days each to an inmate who has used his or her time 105 constructively and demonstrated a diligent commitment to 106 rehabilitation considering the availability and accessibility of 107 education, work assignments, workforce preparation training, and 108 any other programming in the inmateâs place or places of 109 incarceration. 110 (h)1.(e)1.âNotwithstanding subparagraph (b)3., for 111 sentences imposed for offenses committed on or after October 1, 112 2014, and before July 1, 2023, the department may not grant 113 incentive gain-time if the offense is a violation of s. 114 782.04(1)(a)2.c.; s. 787.01(3)(a)2. or 3.; s. 787.02(3)(a)2. or 115 3.; s. 794.011, excluding s. 794.011(10); s. 800.04; s. 116 825.1025; or s. 847.0135(5). 117 2.âNotwithstanding subparagraph (b)3., for sentences 118 imposed for offenses committed on or after July 1, 2023, the 119 department may not grant incentive gain-time if the offense is 120 for committing or attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to 121 commit a violation of s. 782.04(1)(a)2.c.; s. 787.01(3)(a)2. or 122 3.; s. 787.02(3)(a)2. or 3.; s. 794.011, excluding s. 123 794.011(10); s. 800.04; s. 825.1025; or s. 847.0135(5). 124 (i)(f)âAn inmate who is subject to subparagraph (b)3. is 125 not eligible to earn or receive gain-time under paragraph (a), 126 paragraph (b), paragraph (c), or paragraph (d), paragraph (e), 127 paragraph (f), or paragraph (g) or any other type of gain-time 128 in an amount that would cause a sentence to expire, end, or 129 terminate, or that would result in a prisonerâs release, before 130 prior to serving a minimum of 65 percent of the sentence imposed 131 for inmates serving a sentence for a nonviolent felony as 132 defined in s. 948.20(1), or 85 percent of the sentence imposed. 133 For purposes of this paragraph, credits awarded by the court for 134 time physically incarcerated shall be credited toward 135 satisfaction of the applicable minimum 85 percent of the 136 sentence imposed. Except as provided by this section, a prisoner 137 may not accumulate further gain-time awards at any point when 138 the tentative release date is the same as that date at which the 139 prisoner will have served the applicable minimum 85 percent of 140 the sentence imposed. State prisoners sentenced to life 141 imprisonment shall be incarcerated for the rest of their natural 142 lives, unless granted pardon or clemency. 143 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (c) through (g) of subsection 144 (3) of section 1002.37, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 145 paragraphs (d) through (h), respectively, a new paragraph (c) 146 and paragraph (i) are added to that subsection, paragraph (e) is 147 added to subsection (10) of that section, and paragraphs (a) and 148 (b) of subsection (1), paragraphs (c) and (j) of subsection (2), 149 paragraph (a) of subsection (3), and subsections (7) and (11) of 150 that section are amended, to read: 151 1002.37âThe Florida Virtual School.â 152 (1)(a)âThe Florida Virtual School is established for the 153 development and delivery of online and blended distance learning 154 education. The Commissioner of Education shall monitor the 155 schoolâs performance and report its performance to the State 156 Board of Education and the Legislature. 157 (b)âThe mission of the Florida Virtual School is to provide 158 students with technology-based educational opportunities to gain 159 the knowledge and skills necessary to succeed. The school shall 160 serve any student in this the state who meets the profile for 161 success in this educational delivery context and shall give 162 priority to all of the following: 163 1.âStudents who need expanded access to courses in order to 164 meet their educational goals, such as home education students 165 and students in inner-city and rural high schools who do not 166 have access to higher-level courses. 167 2.âStudents seeking accelerated access in order to obtain a 168 high school diploma at least one semester early. 169 3.âStudents who are children of an active duty member of 170 the United States Armed Forces who is not stationed in this 171 state whose home of record or state of legal residence is 172 Florida. 173 4.âStudents enrolled in the Florida Virtual School Justice 174 Education Program pursuant to s. 1002.371. 175 176 The board of trustees of the Florida Virtual School shall 177 identify appropriate performance measures and standards based on 178 student achievement that reflect the schoolâs statutory mission 179 and priorities, and shall implement an accountability system for 180 the school that includes assessment of its effectiveness and 181 efficiency in providing quality services that encourage high 182 student achievement, seamless articulation, and maximum access. 183 (2)âThe Florida Virtual School shall be governed by a board 184 of trustees comprised of seven members appointed by the Governor 185 to 4-year staggered terms. The board of trustees shall be a 186 public agency entitled to sovereign immunity pursuant to s. 187 768.28, and board members shall be public officers who shall 188 bear fiduciary responsibility for the Florida Virtual School. 189 The board of trustees shall have the following powers and 190 duties: 191 (c)âThe board of trustees shall aggressively seek avenues 192 to generate revenue to support its future endeavors, and shall 193 enter into agreements with blended distance learning providers. 194 The board of trustees may acquire, enjoy, use, and dispose of 195 patents, copyrights, and trademarks and any licenses and other 196 rights or interests thereunder or therein. Ownership of all such 197 patents, copyrights, trademarks, licenses, and rights or 198 interests thereunder or therein shall vest in the state, with 199 the board of trustees having full right of use and full right to 200 retain the revenues derived therefrom. Any funds realized from 201 patents, copyrights, trademarks, or licenses are shall be 202 considered internal funds as provided in s. 1011.07. Such funds 203 shall be used to support the schoolâs marketing and research and 204 development activities in order to improve courseware and 205 services to its students. 206 (j)âThe board of trustees shall submit to the State Board 207 of Education both forecasted and actual enrollments and credit 208 completions for the Florida Virtual School, according to 209 procedures established by the State Board of Education. At a 210 minimum, such procedures must include the number of public, 211 private, and home education students served, by program and by 212 county of residence, and the number of students enrolled in the 213 Florida Virtual School Justice Education Program pursuant to s. 214 1002.371. 215 216 The Governor shall designate the initial chair of the board of 217 trustees to serve a term of 4 years. Members of the board of 218 trustees shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed 219 for per diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. The 220 board of trustees shall be a body corporate with all the powers 221 of a body corporate and such authority as is needed for the 222 proper operation and improvement of the Florida Virtual School. 223 The board of trustees is specifically authorized to adopt rules, 224 policies, and procedures, consistent with law and rules of the 225 State Board of Education related to governance, personnel, 226 budget and finance, administration, programs, curriculum and 227 instruction, travel and purchasing, technology, students, 228 contracts and grants, and property as necessary for optimal, 229 efficient operation of the Florida Virtual School. Tangible 230 personal property owned by the board of trustees shall be 231 subject to the provisions of chapter 273. 232 (3)âFunding for the Florida Virtual School shall be 233 provided as follows: 234 (a)1.âThe calculation of a âfull-time equivalent studentâ 235 enrolled in an online learning program is shall be as prescribed 236 in s. 1011.61(1)(c)1.b.(V) and is subject to s. 1011.61(3). 237 2.âThe calculation of a full-time equivalent student 238 enrolled in a blended learning program offered pursuant to s. 239 1002.371 is prescribed in s. 1011.61(1)(c)1.b.(I) and is subject 240 to s. 1011.61(4). 241 3.âFor a student in a home education program, funding shall 242 be provided in accordance with this subsection upon course 243 completion if the parent verifies, upon enrollment for each 244 course, that the student is registered with the school district 245 as a home education student pursuant to s. 1002.41(1)(a). 246 (c)âA full-time equivalent student enrolled in a blended 247 learning program offered pursuant to s. 1002.371, including a 248 student enrolled during the summer, must be reported to the 249 Department of Education in the manner the department prescribes 250 and must be funded through the Florida Education Finance 251 Program. 252 (i)âThe Florida Virtual School may be funded for blended 253 learning through the Florida Education Finance Program only for 254 full-time students enrolled in the Florida Virtual School 255 Justice Education Program pursuant to s. 1002.371. However, such 256 students may enroll in online courses and be funded as provided 257 in paragraph (a). 258 (7)âThe board of trustees shall annually submit to the 259 Governor, the Legislature, the Commissioner of Education, and 260 the State Board of Education the audit report prepared pursuant 261 to subsection (6) and a complete and detailed report setting 262 forth: 263 (a)âThe operations and accomplishments of the Florida 264 Virtual School within this the state and those occurring outside 265 this the state as Florida Virtual School Global and, beginning 266 with the 2026-2027 school year, the Florida Virtual School 267 Justice Education Program established under s. 1002.371. 268 (b)âThe marketing and operational plan for the Florida 269 Virtual School, and Florida Virtual School Global, and, 270 beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the Florida Virtual 271 School Justice Education Program established under s. 1002.371, 272 including recommendations regarding methods for improving the 273 delivery of education through the Internet and other distance 274 learning technology. 275 (c)âThe assets and liabilities of the Florida Virtual 276 School and Florida Virtual School Global at the end of the 277 fiscal year. 278 (d)âRecommendations regarding the unit cost of providing 279 services to students through the Florida Virtual School, and 280 Florida Virtual School Global, and, beginning with the 2026-2027 281 school year, the Florida Virtual School Justice Education 282 Program established under s. 1002.371. In order to most 283 effectively develop public policy regarding any future funding 284 of the Florida Virtual School, it is imperative that the cost of 285 the program is accurately identified. The identified cost of the 286 program must be based on reliable data. 287 (e)âRecommendations regarding an accountability mechanism 288 to assess the effectiveness of the services provided by the 289 Florida Virtual School, and Florida Virtual School Global, and, 290 beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the Florida Virtual 291 School Justice Education Program established under s. 1002.371. 292 (10) 293 (e)âStudents enrolled in the Florida Virtual School Justice 294 Education Program pursuant to s. 1002.371 must take all industry 295 certification examinations, national assessments, and statewide 296 standardized assessments at the institution or facility operated 297 by, or under the supervision of, the Department of Corrections. 298 (11)âThe Florida Virtual School shall receive a school 299 grade pursuant to s. 1008.34 for students receiving full-time 300 instruction pursuant to this section. School performance for the 301 Florida Virtual School as it relates to the Florida Virtual 302 School Justice Education Program must be assessed based on 303 student learning gains and student progression, as demonstrated 304 by the student assessment instrument and protocol selected 305 pursuant to s. 1002.371(6). 306 Section 3.âSection 1002.371, Florida Statutes, is created 307 to read: 308 1002.371âFlorida Virtual School Justice Education Program.â 309 (1)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the Florida 310 Virtual School shall establish the Florida Virtual School 311 Justice Education Program to offer inmates younger than 22 years 312 of age housed in institutions and facilities operated by, or 313 under the supervision of, the Department of Corrections the 314 opportunity to earn a standard high school diploma pursuant to 315 s. 1003.4282. Courses must be delivered in an educational 316 setting under the supervision of the Department of Corrections 317 by Florida Virtual School personnel certified pursuant to s. 318 1012.55 who provide instruction through online courses pursuant 319 to s. 1002.37 or through blended learning courses consisting of 320 both traditional classroom and online instructional techniques. 321 Students in blended learning courses must be full-time students 322 of the school as provided in s. 1011.61(1)(a)1. The funding, 323 performance, and accountability requirements for blended 324 learning courses are the same as those for traditional classroom 325 courses. 326 (2)âThe Florida Virtual School shall separately report all 327 students enrolled in the program for purposes of the Florida 328 Education Finance Program. 329 (3)âThe Florida Virtual School shall receive state funds 330 for operating purposes as provided in the General Appropriations 331 Act for students enrolled in the program. The calculation to 332 determine the amount of state funds is prescribed in s. 333 1002.37(3)(g). 334 (4)âThe program must include and receive funding for a 335 summer school period that must begin on the day immediately 336 following the end of the regular school year and end on the day 337 immediately preceding the subsequent regular school year. 338 Students may not be funded for more than 25 hours per week of 339 instruction. 340 (5)âA student who turns 22 years of age while enrolled in 341 the program may remain enrolled if his or her continued 342 enrollment is approved by the Florida Virtual School and the 343 Department of Corrections; however, funding for such student may 344 not be reported through the Florida Education Finance Program. 345 (6)âThe Department of Education, with assistance from the 346 Florida Virtual School and the Department of Corrections, shall 347 select a common student assessment instrument and protocol for 348 measuring student learning gains and student progression for 349 students receiving full-time instruction pursuant to this 350 section. The Department of Education, the Florida Virtual 351 School, and the Department of Corrections shall jointly review 352 the effectiveness of such assessment instrument and protocol and 353 implement changes as necessary. 354 (7)âA student removed from the program may appeal to the 355 Department of Education to seek reinstatement, subject to a 356 final determination on the appeal by the Commissioner of 357 Education. 358 (8)âBy July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Florida 359 Virtual School shall negotiate a cooperative agreement with the 360 Department of Corrections for the delivery of educational 361 services to students under the jurisdiction of the Department of 362 Corrections to implement the program. Such agreement must 363 provide for, but need not be limited to: 364 (a)âRoles and responsibilities of the Florida Virtual 365 School and the Department of Corrections, including the roles 366 and responsibilities of contract providers. 367 (b)âResolution of administrative issues, including 368 procedures for sharing information. 369 (c)âAllocation of resources, including the maximization of 370 state and federal funding. 371 (d)âProcedures for educational evaluation for exceptional 372 education students and those with special needs. 373 (e)âProcedures for individualized progress monitoring plans 374 developed for all students not classified upon entry to the 375 program as exceptional education students. Such plans must 376 address academic, literacy, career, and technical skills and 377 must include provisions for intensive remedial instruction in 378 areas of weakness. 379 (f)âCurriculum and delivery of instruction, including 380 resources required for delivery of instruction through 381 technological means. 382 (g)âProcedures for assessments, including, but not limited 383 to, industry certification examinations, national assessments, 384 and statewide, standardized assessments administered pursuant to 385 s. 1008.22 at an institution or facility operated by the 386 Department of Corrections. 387 (h)âClassroom management procedures and attendance 388 policies. 389 (i)âProcedures for provision of qualified personnel, 390 whether supplied by the Florida Virtual School or the Department 391 of Corrections, and for the performance of their duties in a 392 Department of Corrections setting. 393 (j)âProvisions for improving skills in teaching and working 394 with students in the program. 395 (k)âTransition plans for students moving into and out of 396 the program, including graduates transitioning to postsecondary 397 education or into the workforce. 398 (l)âProcedures and timelines for the timely documentation 399 of credits earned and the transfer of student records. 400 (m)âMethods and procedures for dispute resolution. 401 (n)âProvisions for ensuring the safety of education 402 personnel and support for the agreed-upon education program. 403 (9)âThis section and the cooperative agreement required 404 under subsection (8) do not require the Florida Virtual School 405 to provide more services than can be supported by the funds 406 generated by students participating in the program. 407 (10)âThis section does not prohibit a student from 408 participating in the Correctional Education Program pursuant to 409 s. 944.801. 410 (11)âThe State Board of Education and the Department of 411 Corrections shall adopt rules to administer this section. 412 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 413 1011.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 414 1011.61âDefinitions.âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 415 1000.21, the following terms are defined as follows for the 416 purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program: 417 (1)âA âfull-time equivalent studentâ in each program of the 418 district is defined in terms of full-time students and part-time 419 students as follows: 420 (c)1.âA âfull-time equivalent studentâ is: 421 a.âA full-time student in any one of the programs listed in 422 s. 1011.62(1)(c); or 423 b.âA combination of full-time or part-time students in any 424 one of the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) which is the 425 equivalent of one full-time student based on the following 426 calculations: 427 (I)âA full-time student in a combination of programs listed 428 in s. 1011.62(1)(c) shall be a fraction of a full-time 429 equivalent membership in each special program equal to the 430 number of net hours per school year for which he or she is a 431 member, divided by the appropriate number of hours set forth in 432 subparagraph (a)1. The difference between that fraction or sum 433 of fractions and the maximum value as set forth in subsection 434 (4) for each full-time student is presumed to be the balance of 435 the studentâs time not spent in a special program and shall be 436 recorded as time in the appropriate basic program. 437 (II)âA prekindergarten student with a disability shall meet 438 the requirements specified for kindergarten students. 439 (III)âA full-time equivalent student for students in 440 kindergarten through grade 12 in a full-time virtual instruction 441 program under s. 1002.45 or a virtual charter school under s. 442 1002.33 shall consist of six full-credit completions or the 443 prescribed level of content that counts toward promotion to the 444 next grade in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c). Credit 445 completions may be a combination of full-credit courses or half 446 credit courses. 447 (IV)âA full-time equivalent student for students in 448 kindergarten through grade 12 in a part-time virtual instruction 449 program under s. 1002.45 shall consist of six full-credit 450 completions in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3. 451 Credit completions may be a combination of full-credit courses 452 or half-credit courses. 453 (V)âA Florida Virtual School full-time equivalent student 454 in an online program shall consist of six full-credit 455 completions or the prescribed level of content that counts 456 toward promotion to the next grade in the programs listed in s. 457 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3. for students participating in 458 kindergarten through grade 12 part-time virtual instruction and 459 the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) for students 460 participating in kindergarten through grade 12 full-time virtual 461 instruction. Credit completions may be a combination of full 462 credit courses or half-credit courses. 463 (VI)âEach successfully completed full-credit course earned 464 through an online course delivered by a district other than the 465 one in which the student resides shall be calculated as 1/6 FTE. 466 (VII)âA full-time equivalent student for courses requiring 467 passage of a statewide, standardized end-of-course assessment 468 under s. 1003.4282 to earn a standard high school diploma shall 469 be defined and reported based on the number of instructional 470 hours as provided in this subsection. 471 (VIII)âFor students enrolled in a school district as a 472 full-time student, the district may report 1/6 FTE for each 473 student who passes a statewide, standardized end-of-course 474 assessment without being enrolled in the corresponding course. 475 2.âA student in membership in a program scheduled for more 476 or less than 180 school days or the equivalent on an hourly 477 basis as specified by rules of the State Board of Education is a 478 fraction of a full-time equivalent membership equal to the 479 number of instructional hours in membership divided by the 480 appropriate number of hours set forth in subparagraph (a)1.; 481 however, for the purposes of this subparagraph, membership in 482 programs scheduled for more than 180 days is limited to students 483 enrolled in: 484 a.âJuvenile justice education programs. 485 b.âThe Florida Virtual School. 486 c.âVirtual instruction programs and virtual charter schools 487 for the purpose of course completion and credit recovery 488 pursuant to ss. 1002.45 and 1003.498. Course completion applies 489 only to a student who is reported during the second or third 490 membership surveys and who does not complete a virtual education 491 course by the end of the regular school year. The course must be 492 completed no later than the deadline for amending the final 493 student enrollment survey for that year. Credit recovery applies 494 only to a student who has unsuccessfully completed a traditional 495 or virtual education course during the regular school year and 496 must retake the course in order to be eligible to graduate with 497 the studentâs class. 498 499 The full-time equivalent student enrollment calculated under 500 this subsection is subject to the requirements in subsection 501 (3). 502 503 The department shall determine and implement an equitable method 504 of equivalent funding for schools operating under emergency 505 conditions, which schools have been approved by the department 506 to operate for less than the minimum term as provided in s. 507 1011.60(2). 508 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.